Louisiana, session 2026, HB822.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:2740.70.11 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2740.70.11. Boards of commissioners of certain economic development districts;
appointments; limitations
A nonprofit entity authorized by the provisions of state law to appoint one or
more members to the board of commissioners of an economic development district
located in a municipality having a population exceeding three hundred thousand
persons, based on the latest federal decennial census, shall forfeit its authority to
make such appointments if the nonprofit entity has not been in good standing with
the secretary of state for three consecutive years. Such forfeiture shall exist for a
minimum period of two years even if the nonprofit entity takes the necessary actions
to be in good standing with the secretary of state within the two-year period.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.